Texas, session 892, HB200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subtitle B, Title 9, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Chapter 787 to read as follows: CHAPTER 787. EMERGENCY COMMUNICATION DEVICES FOR CERTAIN FACILITIES Sec. 787.001.  DEFINITION. In this chapter, "floodplain" means any area: (1)  with a one percent annual chance of flooding and susceptible to periodic inundation by water from any source; or (2)  within a 100-year floodplain identified by the Federal Emergency Management Agency under the National Flood Insurance Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. Section 4001 et seq.). Sec. 787.002.  APPLICABILITY. This chapter applies only to a facility that: (1)  provides services to vulnerable populations, including children, elderly individuals, and individuals with disabilities; and (2)  either: (A)  is located within a floodplain; or (B)  has previously been affected by a natural disaster resulting in an inability of individuals to communicate within the facility during the disaster. Sec. 787.003.  REQUIRED FACILITY EMERGENCY COMMUNICATION DEVICE. A facility to which this chapter applies shall maintain a device adequate to allow communication by the individuals receiving services at the facility during an emergency without regard to access to landline technologies or cell tower connectivity, including: (1)  portable satellite communications equipment; or (2)  radios. Sec. 787.004.  CIVIL LIABILITY. (a)  An individual receiving services at a facility to which this chapter applies may bring an action against the facility for damages resulting from a violation of this chapter. (b)  A prevailing claimant in an action brought under this section may recover attorney's fees and costs incurred in bringing the action. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.